Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3989.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin WASHINGTON COUNTY; CSAH 10 AND CSAH 17 INTERSECTION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $2,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Washington County to construct improvements at the intersection of County State Aid Highway 10 (10th Street North), County State Aid Highway 17 (Lake Elmo Avenue), and County Road 17B, in the city of Lake Elmo. This appropriation includes money for improvements related to traffic control, drainage and runoff, and pedestrian and bicycle facilities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $2,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end